California statutes. Commercial Code
(d) Payment of the judgment for damages obtained pursuant to subdivision (a) entitles the lessee to the use and possession of the goods not then disposed of for the remaining lease term of and in accordance with the lease agreement. 

(e) After default by the lessee under the lease contract of the type described in subdivision (a) of, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of, Section 10523 or, if agreed, after other default by the lessee, a lessor who is held not entitled to rent under this section must nevertheless be awarded damages for nonacceptance under Section 10527 or 10528.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 67.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10530.

Incidental damages to an aggrieved lessor include any commercially reasonable charges, expenses, or commissions incurred in stopping delivery, in the transportation, care and custody of goods after the lessee’s default, in connection with return or disposition of the goods, or otherwise resulting from the default.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 5.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------

10531.

(a) If a third party so deals with goods that have been identified to a lease contract as to cause actionable injury to a party to the lease contract (1) the lessor has a right of action against the third party, and (2) the lessee also has a right of action against the third party if the lessee: 

(A) Has a security interest in the goods; 

(B) Has an insurable interest in the goods; or 

(C) Bears the risk of loss under the lease contract or has since the injury assumed that risk as against the lessor and the goods have been converted or destroyed. 

(b) If at the time of the injury the party plaintiff did not bear the risk of loss as against the other party to the lease contract and there is no arrangement between them for disposition of the recovery, his or her suit or settlement, subject to his or her own interest, is as a fiduciary for the other party
 to the lease contract. 

(c) Either party with the consent of the other may sue for the benefit of whom it may concern.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 68.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

10532.

In addition to any other recovery permitted by this division or other law, the lessor may recover from the lessee an amount that will fully compensate the lessor for any loss of or damage to the lessor’s residual interest in the goods caused by the default of the lessee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 111, Sec. 69.   Effective July 15, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Transition Provisions [10600. - 10600.]

10600.

This division shall apply to all lease contracts that are first made or that first become effective between the parties on or after January 1, 1990. This division shall not apply to any lease contract first made or that first became effective between the parties prior to January 1, 1990, or to any extension, amendment, modification, renewal, or supplement of or to the lease contract, unless the parties thereto specifically agree in writing that the lease contract, as extended, amended, modified, renewed, or supplemented, shall be governed by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1359, Sec. 5.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 11 of Ch. 1359.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11. FUNDS TRANSFERS [11101. - 11507.]



CHAPTER 1. Subject Matter and Definitions [11101. - 11108.]

11101.

This division may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code—Funds Transfers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 11108, this division applies to funds transfers defined in Section 11104.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11103.

(a) In this division:

(1) “Payment order” means an instruction of a sender to a receiving bank, transmitted orally or in a record, to pay, or to cause another bank to pay, a fixed or determinable amount of money to a beneficiary if all of the following apply:

(i) The instruction does not state a condition to payment to the beneficiary other than time of payment.

(ii) The receiving bank is to be reimbursed by debiting an account of, or otherwise receiving payment from, the sender.

(iii) The instruction is transmitted by the sender directly to the receiving bank or to an agent, funds-transfer system, or communication system for transmittal to the receiving bank.

(2) “Beneficiary” means the person to be paid by the beneficiary’s bank.

(3) “Beneficiary’s bank” means the bank identified in a payment order in which an account of the beneficiary is to be credited pursuant to the order or which otherwise is to make payment to the beneficiary if the order does not provide for payment to an account.

(4) “Receiving bank” means the bank to which the sender’s instruction is addressed.

(5) “Sender” means the person giving the instruction
 to the receiving bank.

(b) If an instruction complying with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is to make more than one payment to a beneficiary, the instruction is a separate payment order with respect to each payment.

(c) A payment order is issued when it is sent to the receiving bank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 81.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11104.

In this division:

(a) “Funds transfer” means the series of transactions, beginning with the originator’s payment order, made for the purpose of making payment to the beneficiary of the order. The term includes any payment order issued by the originator’s bank or an intermediary bank intended to carry out the originator’s payment order. A funds transfer is completed by acceptance by the beneficiary’s bank of a payment order for the benefit of the beneficiary of the originator’s payment order.

(b) “Intermediary bank” means a receiving bank other than the originator’s bank or the beneficiary’s bank.

(c) “Originator” means the sender of the first payment order in a funds transfer.

(d) “Originator’s bank” means (i) the receiving bank to which the payment order of the originator is issued if the originator is not a bank, or (ii) the originator if the originator is a bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.

(a) In this division:

(1) “Authorized account” means a deposit account of a customer in a bank designated by the customer as a source of payment of payment orders issued by the customer to the bank. If a customer does not so designate an account, any account of the customer is an authorized account if payment of a payment order from that account is not inconsistent with a restriction on the use of that account.

(2) “Bank” means a person engaged in the business of banking and includes a savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, and trust company. A branch or separate office of a bank is a separate bank for purposes of this division.

(3) “Customer” means a person, including a bank, having an account with a bank or from whom a bank has agreed to receive
 payment orders.

(4) “Funds-transfer business day” of a receiving bank means the part of a day during which the receiving bank is open for the receipt, processing, and transmittal of payment orders and cancellations and amendments of payment orders.

(5) “Funds-transfer system” means a wire transfer network, automated clearinghouse, or other communication system of a clearinghouse or other association of banks through which a payment order by a bank may be transmitted to the bank to which the order is addressed.

(6) [Reserved]

(7) “Prove” with respect to a fact means to meet the burden of establishing the fact under subdivision (8) of Section 1201.

(b) Other definitions applying to this division and the sections in which they appear are:

Acceptance: Section 11209.

Beneficiary: Section 11103.

Beneficiary’s bank: Section 11103.

Executed: Section
 11301.

Execution date: Section 11301.

Funds transfer: Section 11104.

Funds-transfer system rule: Section 11501.

Intermediary bank: Section 11104.

Originator: Section 11104.

Originator’s bank: Section 11104.

Payment by beneficiary’s bank to beneficiary: Section 11405.

Payment by originator to beneficiary: Section 11406.

Payment by sender to receiving bank: Section 11403.

Payment date: Section 11401.

Payment order: Section 11103.

Receiving bank: Section 11103.

Security procedure: Section 11201.

Sender: Section 11103.

(c) The following definitions in Division 4 (commencing with Section 4101) apply to this division:

Clearinghouse: Section 4104.

Item: Section 4104.

Suspends payments: Section 4104.

(d) In addition, Division 1 (commencing with Section 1101) contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout
 this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11106.

(a) The time of receipt of a payment order or communication canceling or amending a payment order is determined by the rules applicable to receipt of a notice stated in Section 1202. A receiving bank may fix a cutoff time or times on a funds-transfer business day for the receipt and processing of payment orders and communications canceling or amending payment orders. Different cutoff times may apply to payment orders, cancellations, or amendments, or to different categories of payment orders, cancellations, or amendments. A cutoff time may apply to senders generally or different cutoff times may apply to different senders or categories of payment orders. If a payment order or communication canceling or amending a payment order is received after the close of a funds-transfer business day or after the appropriate cutoff time on a funds-transfer business
 day, the receiving bank may treat the payment order or communication as received at the opening of the next funds-transfer business day.

(b) If this division refers to an execution date or payment date or states a day on which a receiving bank is required to take action, and the date or day does not fall on a funds-transfer business day, the next day that is a funds-transfer business day is treated as the date or day stated, unless the contrary is stated in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11107.

Regulations of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and operating circulars of the Federal Reserve Banks supersede any inconsistent provision of this division to the extent of the inconsistency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11108.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), this division does not apply to a funds transfer any part of which is governed by the Electronic Fund Transfer Act of 1978 (Title XX, Public Law 95-630, 92 Stat. 3728, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1693 et seq.) as amended from time to time.

(b) This division shall apply to a funds transfer that is a remittance transfer as defined in Section 1693o-1 of Title 15 of the United States Code, as amended from time to time, unless the remittance transfer is an electronic fund transfer as defined in Section 1693a of Title 15 of the United States Code, as amended from time to time.

(c) In a funds
 transfer pursuant to this division, if there is an inconsistency between the applicable provision of this division and the federal act, the applicable provisions of the federal act shall control to the extent of the inconsistency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 392, Sec. 1.   (SB 708)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Issue and Acceptance of Payment Order [11201. - 11212.]

11201.

“Security procedure” means a procedure established by agreement of a customer and a receiving bank for the purpose of (i) verifying that a payment order or communication amending or canceling a payment order is that of the customer, or (ii) detecting error in the transmission or the content of the payment order or communication. A security procedure may impose an obligation on the receiving bank or the customer and may require the use of algorithms or other codes, identifying words, numbers, symbols, sounds, biometrics, encryption, callback procedures, or similar security devices. Comparison of a signature on a payment order or communication with an authorized specimen signature of the customer or requiring a payment order to be
 sent from a known email address, IP address, or telephone number is not by itself a security procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 82.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11202.

(a) A payment order received by the receiving bank is the authorized order of the person identified as sender if that person authorized the order or is otherwise bound by it under the law of agency.

(b) If a bank and its customer have agreed that the authenticity of payment orders issued to the bank in the name of the customer as sender will be verified pursuant to a security procedure, a payment order received by the receiving bank is effective as the order of the customer, whether or not authorized, if (i) the security procedure is a commercially reasonable method of providing security against unauthorized payment orders, and (ii) the bank proves
 that it accepted the payment order in good faith and in compliance with the bank’s obligations under the security procedure and any agreement or instruction of the customer, evidenced by a record, restricting acceptance of payment orders issued in the name of the customer. The bank is not required to follow an instruction that violates an agreement with the customer, evidenced by a record, or notice of which is not received at a time and in a manner affording the bank a reasonable opportunity to act on it before the payment order is accepted.

(c) Commercial reasonableness of a security procedure is a question of law to be determined by considering the wishes of the customer expressed to the bank, the circumstances of the customer known to the bank, including the size, type, and frequency of payment orders normally issued by the
 customer to the bank, alternative security procedures offered to the customer, and security procedures in general use by customers and receiving banks similarly situated. A security procedure is deemed to be commercially reasonable if (i) the security procedure was chosen by the customer after the bank offered, and the customer refused, a security procedure that was commercially reasonable for that customer, and (ii) the customer expressly agreed in a record to be bound by any payment order, whether or not authorized, issued in its name and accepted by the bank in compliance with the bank’s obligations under the security procedure chosen by the customer.

(d) The term “sender” in this division includes the customer in whose name a payment order is issued if the order is the authorized order of the customer under subdivision (a), or it is
 effective as the order of the customer under subdivision (b).

(e) This section applies to amendments and cancellations of payment orders to the same extent it applies to payment orders.

(f) Except as provided in this section and in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11203, rights and obligations arising under this section or Section 11203 may not be varied by agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 83.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11203.

(a) If an accepted payment order is not, under subdivision (a) of Section 11202, an authorized order of a customer identified as sender, but is effective as an order of the customer pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11202, the following rules apply:

(1) By express agreement evidenced by a record, the receiving bank may limit the extent to which it is entitled to enforce or retain payment of the payment order.

(2) The receiving bank is not entitled to enforce or retain payment of the payment order if the customer proves that the order was not caused, directly or indirectly,
 by a person (i) entrusted at any time with duties to act for the customer with respect to payment orders or the security procedure, or (ii) who obtained access to transmitting facilities of the customer or who obtained, from a source controlled by the customer and without authority of the receiving bank, information facilitating breach of the security procedure, regardless of how the information was obtained or whether the customer was at fault. Information includes any access device, computer software, or the like.

(b) This section applies to amendments of payment orders to the same extent it applies to payment orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 84.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11204.

(a) If a receiving bank accepts a payment order issued in the name of its customer as sender which is (i) not authorized and not effective as the order of the customer under Section 11202, or (ii) not enforceable, in whole or in part, against the customer under Section 11203, the bank shall refund any payment of the payment order received from the customer to the extent the bank is not entitled to enforce payment and shall pay interest on the refundable amount calculated from the date the bank received payment to the date of the refund. However, the customer is not entitled to interest from the bank on the amount to be refunded if the customer fails to exercise ordinary care to determine that the order was not authorized by the customer and to notify the bank of the relevant facts within a reasonable time not exceeding 90 days after the date the
 customer received notification from the bank that the order was accepted or that the customer’s account was debited with respect to the order. The bank is not entitled to any recovery from the customer on account of a failure by the customer to give notification as stated in this section.

(b) Reasonable time under subdivision (a) may be fixed by agreement as stated in subdivision (b) of Section 1302, but the obligation of a receiving bank to refund payment as stated in subdivision (a) may not otherwise be varied by agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 254, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11205.

(a) If an accepted payment order was transmitted pursuant to a security procedure for the detection of error and the payment order (i) erroneously instructed payment to a beneficiary not intended by the sender, (ii) erroneously instructed payment in an amount greater than the amount intended by the sender, or (iii) was an erroneously transmitted duplicate of a payment order previously sent by the sender, the following rules apply:

(1) If the sender proves that the sender or a person acting on behalf of the sender pursuant to Section 11206 complied with the security procedure and that the error would have been detected if the receiving bank had also complied, the sender is not obliged to pay the order to the extent stated in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(2) If the funds transfer is completed on the basis of an erroneous payment order described in clause (i) or (iii) of this subdivision, the sender is not obliged to pay
 the order and the receiving bank is entitled to recover from the beneficiary any amount paid to the beneficiary to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and restitution.

(3) If the funds transfer is completed on the basis of a payment order described in clause (ii) of this subdivision, the sender is not obliged to pay the order to the extent the amount received by the beneficiary is greater than the amount intended by the sender. In that case, the receiving bank is entitled to recover from the beneficiary the excess amount received to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and restitution.

(b) If (i) the sender of an erroneous payment order described in subdivision (a) is not obliged to pay all or part of the order, and (ii) the sender receives notification from the receiving bank that the order was accepted by the bank or that the sender’s account was debited with respect to the order, the sender has a duty to exercise ordinary
 care, on the basis of information available to the sender, to discover the error with respect to the order and to advise the bank of the relevant facts within a reasonable time, not exceeding 90 days, after the bank’s notification was received by the sender. If the bank proves that the sender failed to perform that duty, the sender is liable to the bank for the loss the bank proves it incurred as a result of the failure, but the liability of the sender may not exceed the amount of the sender’s order.

(c) This section applies to amendments to payment orders to the same extent it applies to payment orders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11206.

(a) If a payment order addressed to a receiving bank is transmitted to a funds-transfer system or other third-party communication system for transmittal to the bank, the system is deemed to be an agent of the sender for the purpose of transmitting the payment order to the bank. If there is a discrepancy between the terms of the payment order transmitted to the system and the terms of the payment order transmitted by the system to the bank, the terms of the payment order of the sender are those transmitted by the system. This section does not apply to a funds-transfer system of the Federal Reserve Banks.

(b) This section applies to cancellations and amendments of payment orders to the same extent it applies to payment orders.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11207.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), if, in a payment order received by the beneficiary’s bank, the name, bank account number, or other identification of the beneficiary refers to a nonexistent or unidentifiable person or account, no person has rights as a beneficiary of the order and acceptance of the order cannot occur.

(b) If a payment order received by the beneficiary’s bank identifies the beneficiary both by name and by an identifying or bank account number and the name and number identify different persons, the following rules apply:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), if the
 beneficiary’s bank does not know that the name and number refer to different persons, it may rely on the number as the proper identification of the beneficiary of the order. The beneficiary’s bank need not determine whether the name and number refer to the same person.

(2) If the beneficiary’s bank pays the person identified by name or knows that the name and number identify different persons, no person has rights as beneficiary except the person paid by the beneficiary’s bank if that person was entitled to receive payment from the originator of the funds transfer. If no person has rights as beneficiary, acceptance of the order cannot occur.

(c) If (i) a payment order described in subdivision (b) is accepted, (ii) the originator’s payment order described the beneficiary
 inconsistently by name and number, and (iii) the beneficiary’s bank pays the person identified by number as permitted by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the following rules
 apply:

(1) If the originator is a bank, the originator is obliged to pay its order.

(2) If the originator is not a bank and proves that the person identified by number was not entitled to receive payment from the originator, the originator is not obliged to pay its order unless the originator’s bank proves that the originator, before acceptance of the originator’s order, had notice that payment of a payment order issued by the originator might be made by the beneficiary’s bank on the basis of an identifying or bank account number even if it identifies a person different from the named beneficiary. Proof of notice may be made by any admissible evidence. The originator’s bank satisfies the burden of proof if it proves that the originator, before the payment order
 was accepted, signed a record stating the information to which the notice relates.

(d) In a case governed by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), if the beneficiary’s bank rightfully pays the person identified by number and that person was not entitled to receive payment from the originator, the amount paid may be recovered from that person to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and restitution as follows:

(1) If the originator is obliged to pay its payment order as stated in subdivision (c), the originator has the right to recover.

(2) If the originator is not a bank and is not obliged to pay its payment order, the originator’s bank has the right to recover.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 85.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11208.

(a) This subdivision applies to a payment order identifying an intermediary bank or the beneficiary’s bank only by an identifying number.

(1) The receiving bank may rely on the number as the proper identification of the intermediary or beneficiary’s bank and need not determine whether the number identifies a bank.

(2) The sender is obliged to compensate the receiving bank for any loss and expenses incurred by the receiving bank as a result of its reliance on the number in executing or attempting to execute the order.

(b) This subdivision applies to a payment order identifying an intermediary bank or the beneficiary’s bank both by name and an identifying number if the name and number identify different persons.

(1) If the sender is a bank, the receiving bank may rely on the number as the proper identification of the intermediary or beneficiary’s bank if the receiving bank, when it executes the sender’s order, does not know that the name and number identify different persons. The receiving bank need not determine whether the name and number refer to the same person or whether the number refers to a bank. The sender is obliged to compensate the receiving bank for any loss and expenses incurred by the receiving bank as a result of its reliance on the number in executing or attempting to execute the order.

(2) If the sender is not a bank and the receiving bank proves that the sender, before the payment order was accepted, had notice that the receiving bank might rely on the number as the proper identification of the intermediary or beneficiary’s bank even if it identifies a person different from the bank identified by name, the rights and obligations of the sender and the receiving bank are governed by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), as though the sender were a bank. Proof of notice may be made by any admissible evidence. The receiving bank satisfies the burden of proof if it proves that the sender, before the payment order was accepted, signed a record stating the information to which the notice relates.

(3) Regardless of whether the sender is a bank, the receiving bank
 may rely on the name as the proper identification of the intermediary or beneficiary’s bank if the receiving bank, at the time it executes the sender’s order, does not know that the name and number identify different persons. The receiving bank need not determine whether the name and number refer to the same person.

(4) If the receiving bank knows that the name and number identify different persons, reliance on either the name or the number in executing the sender’s payment order is a breach of the obligation stated in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11302.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 86.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11209.

(a) Subject to subdivision (d), a receiving bank other than the beneficiary’s bank accepts a payment order when it executes the order.

(b) Subject to subdivisions (c) and (d), a beneficiary’s bank accepts a payment order at the earliest of the following times:

(1) When the bank (i) pays the beneficiary as stated in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 11405, or (ii) notifies the beneficiary of receipt of the order or that the account of the beneficiary has been credited with respect to the order unless the notice indicates that the bank is rejecting the order or that funds with respect to the order may not be withdrawn or used until receipt of payment from the sender of the order.

(2) When the bank receives payment of the entire amount of the sender’s order pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11403.

(3) The opening of the next
 funds-transfer business day of the bank following the payment date of the order if, at that time, the amount of the sender’s order is fully covered by a withdrawable credit balance in an authorized account of the sender or the bank has otherwise received full payment from the sender, unless the order was rejected before that time or is rejected within (i) one hour after that time, or (ii) one hour after the opening of the next business day of the sender following the payment date if that time is later. If notice of rejection is received by the sender after the payment date and the authorized account of the sender does not bear interest, the bank is obliged to pay interest to the sender on the amount of the order for the number of days elapsing after the payment date to the day the sender receives notice or learns that the order was not accepted, counting that day as an elapsed day. If the withdrawable credit balance during that period falls below the amount of the order, the amount of interest payable is
 reduced accordingly.

(c) Acceptance of a payment order cannot occur before the order is received by the receiving bank. Acceptance does not occur under paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) if the beneficiary of the payment order does not have an account with the receiving bank, the account has been closed, or the receiving bank is not permitted by law to receive credits for the beneficiary’s account.

(d) A payment order issued to the originator’s bank cannot be accepted until the payment date if the bank is the beneficiary’s bank, or the execution date if the bank is not the beneficiary’s bank. If the originator’s bank executes the originator’s payment order before the execution date or pays the beneficiary of the originator’s payment order before the payment date and the payment order is subsequently canceled pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11211, the bank may recover from the beneficiary any payment received to the extent allowed by the
 law governing mistake and restitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11210.

(a) A payment order is rejected by the receiving bank by a notice of rejection transmitted to the sender orally or in a record. A notice of rejection need not use any particular words and is sufficient if it indicates that the receiving bank is rejecting the order or will not execute or pay the order. Rejection is effective when the notice is given if transmission is by a means that is reasonable in the circumstances. If notice of rejection is given by a means that is not reasonable, rejection is effective when the notice is received. If an agreement of the sender and receiving bank establishes the means to be used to reject a payment order, (i) any means complying with the agreement is reasonable and
 (ii) any means not complying is not reasonable unless no significant delay in receipt of the notice resulted from the use of the noncomplying means.

(b) This subdivision applies if a receiving bank other than the beneficiary’s bank fails to execute a payment order despite the existence on the execution date of a withdrawable credit balance in an authorized account of the sender sufficient to cover the order. If the sender does not receive notice of rejection of the order on the execution date and the authorized account of the sender does not bear interest, the bank is obliged to pay interest to the sender on the amount of the order for the number of days elapsing after the execution date to the earlier of the day the order is canceled pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 11211 or the day the sender
 receives notice or learns that the order was not executed, counting the final day of the period as an elapsed day. If the withdrawable credit balance during that period falls below the amount of the order, the amount of interest is reduced accordingly.

(c) If a receiving bank suspends payments, all unaccepted payment orders issued to it are deemed rejected at the time the bank suspends payments.

(d) Acceptance of a payment order precludes a later rejection of the order. Rejection of a payment order precludes a later acceptance of the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 87.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11211.

(a) A communication of the sender of a payment order canceling or amending the order may be transmitted to the receiving bank orally or in a record. If a security procedure is in effect between the sender and the receiving bank, the communication is not effective to cancel or amend the order unless the communication is verified pursuant to the security procedure or the bank agrees to the cancellation or amendment.

(b) Subject to subdivision (a), a communication by the sender canceling or amending a payment order is effective to cancel or amend the order if notice of the communication is received at a time and in a manner affording the
 receiving bank a reasonable opportunity to act on the communication before the bank accepts the payment order.

(c) After a payment order has been accepted, cancellation or amendment of the order is not effective unless the receiving bank agrees or a funds-transfer system rule allows cancellation or amendment without agreement of the bank.

(1) With respect to a payment order accepted by a receiving bank other than the beneficiary’s bank, cancellation or amendment is not effective unless a conforming cancellation or amendment of the payment order issued by the receiving bank is also made.

(2) With respect to a payment order accepted by the beneficiary’s bank, cancellation or amendment is not effective unless the order
 was issued in execution of an unauthorized payment order, or because of a mistake by a sender in the funds transfer which resulted in the issuance of a payment order (i) that is a duplicate of a payment order previously issued by the sender, (ii) that orders payment to a beneficiary not entitled to receive payment from the originator, or (iii) that orders payment in an amount greater than the amount the beneficiary was entitled to receive from the originator. If the payment order is canceled or amended, the beneficiary’s bank is entitled to recover from the beneficiary any amount paid to the beneficiary to the extent allowed by the law governing mistake and restitution.

(d) An unaccepted payment order is canceled by operation of law at the close of the fifth funds-transfer business day of the receiving bank after the execution date or payment
 date of the order.

(e) A canceled payment order cannot be accepted. If an accepted payment order is canceled, the acceptance is nullified and no person has any right or obligation based on the acceptance. Amendment of a payment order is deemed to be cancellation of the original order at the time of amendment and issue of a new payment order in the amended form at the same time.

(f) Unless otherwise provided in an agreement of the parties or in a funds-transfer system rule, if the receiving bank, after accepting a payment order, agrees to cancellation or amendment of the order by the sender or is bound by a funds-transfer system rule allowing cancellation or amendment without the bank’s agreement, the sender, whether or not cancellation or amendment is effective, is
 liable to the bank for any loss and expenses, including reasonable attorney’s fees, incurred by the bank as a result of the cancellation or amendment or attempted cancellation or amendment.

(g) A payment order is not revoked by the death or legal incapacity of the sender unless the receiving bank knows of the death or of an adjudication of incapacity by a court of competent jurisdiction and has reasonable opportunity to act before acceptance of the order.

(h) A funds-transfer system rule is not effective to the extent it conflicts with paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 88.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11212.

If a receiving bank fails to accept a payment order that it is obliged by express agreement to accept, the bank is liable for breach of the agreement to the extent provided in the agreement or in this division, but does not otherwise have any duty to accept a payment order or, before acceptance, to take any action, or refrain from taking action, with respect to the order except as provided in this division or by express agreement. Liability based on acceptance arises only when acceptance occurs as stated in Section 11209, and liability is limited to that provided in this division. A receiving bank is not the agent of the sender or beneficiary of the payment order it accepts, or of any other party to the funds transfer, and the bank owes no duty to any party to the funds transfer except as provided in this division or by express agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Execution of Sender’s Payment Order by Receiving Bank [11301. - 11305.]

11301.

(a) A payment order is “executed” by the receiving bank when it issues a payment order intended to carry out the payment order received by the bank. A payment order received by the beneficiary’s bank can be accepted but cannot be executed.

(b) “Execution date” of a payment order means the day on which the receiving bank may properly issue a payment order in execution of the sender’s order. The execution date may be determined by instruction of the sender but cannot be earlier than the day the order is received and, unless otherwise determined, is the day the order is received. If the sender’s instruction states a payment date, the execution date is the payment date or an earlier date on which execution is reasonably necessary to allow payment to the beneficiary on the payment date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 125, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11302.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, if the receiving bank accepts a payment order pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11209, the bank has the following obligations in executing the order:
